Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 21
VEHICLES ABANDONED ON PRIVATE PROPERTY

Editor's note:

This part 21 was added with relocations in 2002. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning vehicles abandoned on public property, see part 18 of this article.

42-4-2101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the purpose of this part 21 is to provide procedures for the removal, storage, and disposal of motor vehicles that are abandoned on private property.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 477, § 2, effective July 1.

42-4-2102. Definitions.

As used in this part 21, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Abandoned motor vehicle", except as otherwise defined in section 38-20-116 (2.5)(b)(I), C.R.S., for purposes of section 38-20-116 (2.5), C.R.S., means:

Any motor vehicle left unattended on private property for a period of twenty-four hours or longer or for such other period as may be established by local ordinance without the consent of the owner or lessee of such property or the owner's or lessee's legally authorized agent;

Any motor vehicle stored in an impound lot at the request of its owner or the owner's agent and not removed from the impound lot according to the agreement with the owner or agent;

Any motor vehicle that is left on private property without the property owner's consent, towed at the request of the property owner, and not removed from the impound lot by the vehicle owner within forty-eight hours; or

A motor vehicle fitted with an immobilization device that is on private property and deemed to be abandoned pursuant to section 42-4-1105 (7)(c).

"Appraisal" means a bona fide estimate of reasonable market value made by any motor vehicle dealer licensed in this state or by any employee of the Colorado state patrol or of any sheriff's or police department whose appointment for such purpose has been reported by the head of the appointing agency to the executive director of the department.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 766, § 7, effective August 5, 2009.)

"Impound lot" means a parcel of real property that is owned or leased by an operator at which motor vehicles are stored under appropriate protection.

"Operator" means a person or a firm licensed by the public utilities commission as a towing carrier.

"Private property" means any real property that is not public property.

"Public property" means any real property having its title, ownership, use, or possession held by the federal government; this state; or any county, municipality, as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S., or other governmental entity of this state.

"Responsible law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the private property where the motor vehicle becomes abandoned.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 477, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 608, § 1, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2006:

(1)(d) added, p. 172, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

IP(1) amended, p. 545, § 3, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(3) and (5) amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 766, § 7, effective August 5.

42-4-2103. Abandonment of motor vehicles - private property - rules.

Motor vehicles abandoned at repair shops shall be removed as set forth in section 38-20-116 (2.5), C.R.S.

No person shall abandon any motor vehicle upon private property other than his or her own. Any owner or lessee, or the owner's or lessee's agent authorized in writing, may have an abandoned motor vehicle removed from his or her property by having it towed and impounded by an operator. Motor vehicles abandoned upon the property of a motor vehicle recycler may be recycled in accordance with part 22 of this article if the vehicle's appraisal value is less than three hundred fifty dollars.

Any operator having in his or her possession any motor vehicle that was abandoned on private property shall notify, within thirty minutes, the department, the sheriff, or the sheriff's designee, of the county in which the motor vehicle is located or the chief of police, or the chief's designee, of the municipality in which the motor vehicle is located as to the name of the operator and the location of the impound lot where the vehicle is located and a description of the abandoned motor vehicle, including the make, model, color, and year, the number, issuing state, and expiration date of the license plate, and the vehicle identification number. Upon such notification, the law enforcement agency that receives such notice shall assign the vehicle a tow report number immediately, shall enter the vehicle and the fact that it has been towed in the Colorado crime information center computer system, and shall ascertain, if possible, whether or not the vehicle has been reported stolen and, if so reported, such agency shall recover and secure the motor vehicle and notify its rightful owner and terminate the abandonment proceedings under this part 21. Upon the release of the vehicle to the owner or lienholder, the operator shall notify the responsible law enforcement agent who shall adjust or delete the entry in the Colorado crime information center computer system. The responsible law enforcement agency and operator shall have the right to recover from the owner their reasonable fees for recovering and securing the vehicle. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize fees for services that were not provided or that were provided by another person or entity.

An operator shall, no less than two days, but no more than ten days after a motor vehicle has been towed or abandoned, report such motor vehicle tow to the department by first-class or certified mail, by personal delivery, or by internet communication, which report shall be on a form prescribed and supplied by the department.

The report shall contain the following information:

The fact of possession, including the date possession was taken, the location of storage of the abandoned motor vehicle and the location from which it was towed, the tow report number, and the identity of the law enforcement agency determining that the vehicle was not reported stolen;

The identity of the operator possessing the abandoned motor vehicle, together with the operator's business address and telephone number and the carrier number assigned by the public utilities commission; and

A description of the abandoned motor vehicle, including the make, model, color, and year, the number, issuing state, and expiration date of the license plate, or any other indicia of the motor vehicle's state of origin, and the vehicle identification number.

An operator or its agent shall, no less than two days, but no more than ten days after a motor vehicle has been towed or abandoned, determine who the owner is and if there is a lienholder and send a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the owner and any lienholder as determined from records of the department or from the national search performed by the department.
(c) (I) (A) An operator or its agent shall, no less than two days, but no more than ten days after a motor vehicle has been towed or abandoned, determine who the owner is and if there is a lienholder and send a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the owner and any lienholder as determined from records of the department or from the national search performed by the department.

If the department conducts a national title search in accordance with subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (c), each day elapsing between the department being notified and the department returning information on the motor vehicle as a result of the search does not count against the tow operator's ten-day deadline to contact the motor vehicle's owner or any lienholder. This sub-subparagraph (B) does not affect daily storage fees.

The notice must include the information required by the report set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).

The cost of complying with this paragraph (c) is a cost of towing; except that the total of all costs of complying with this section shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. The tow operator shall send the notice to the owner and lienholder within five days after receiving the information from the department.

The operator shall not be entitled to recover any daily storage fees from the day the vehicle is towed until the day the owner and lienholder are notified, unless the operator reasonably attempts to notify the owner and lienholder by the date specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c). Sending a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the owner and the lienholder as represented in department records shall be deemed a reasonable attempt to notify the owner and the lienholder. Failure to notify the owner and the lienholder due to the receipt of erroneous information from the department shall not cause the loss of such storage fees accrued from the date the vehicle is towed until the owner and the lienholder receive such notice.

The department shall implement an electronic system whereby an operator registered under section 42-4-1806 (2) or the agent of such operator shall have access to correct information relating to any owner and lienholder of a vehicle towed by the operator as represented in the department records. The department shall ensure that the information available to an operator or its agent is correct and is limited solely to that information necessary to contact the owner and lienholder of such vehicle.

If the tow operator determines in accordance with this subsection (3) that the department does not have a current record for a motor vehicle, the tow operator shall notify the department in writing, including electronically. Upon receiving the notice, the department shall conduct a title search with an entity that:

Has a national database;

May retrieve records based on both the vehicle identification number and vehicle registration number on the license plate; and

Provides the following information: The vehicle identification number, the vehicle registration number, the owner's name and contact information, and the lienholder's name and contact information.

Within ten working days after receiving the written notice that no record exists under subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (c), the department shall complete its search and shall transmit all relevant information to the responsible law enforcement agency or tow operator. This ten-day period does not decrease the number of days a tow operator has to notify the owner or lienholder in accordance with this paragraph (c).

The department may charge the tow operator a fee in an amount not to exceed the lesser of five dollars or the direct and indirect costs of implementing this paragraph (c).

Within three days after the receipt of the records set forth in subsection (3)(c) of this section from the department, the operator shall notify by certified mail the owner of record, including an out-of-state owner of record. The operator shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain the address of the owner of record. The notice must contain the following information:

That the identified motor vehicle has been reported abandoned to the department;

The claim of any lien under section 42-4-2105;

The location of the motor vehicle and the location from which it was towed; and

That, unless claimed within thirty calendar days after the date the notice was sent, as determined from the postmark on the notice, the motor vehicle is subject to sale.

The department shall maintain department-approved notice forms satisfying the requirements of subsection (4) of this section and shall make them available for use by operators and local law enforcement agencies.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 478, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 545, § 4, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(1)(b), (3)(a), (3)(c)(I), and IP(4) amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 767, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(3)(c)(I) amended and (3)(c)(IV), (3)(c)(V), and (3)(c)(VI) added, (HB 16-1056), ch. 325, p. 1320, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(4) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 373, § 25, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1805 as it existed prior to 2002.

42-4-2104. Appraisal of abandoned motor vehicles - sale.

Motor vehicles that are abandoned on private property shall be appraised and sold by the operator in a commercially reasonable manner at a public or private sale held not less than thirty days nor more than sixty days after the postmarked date the notice was mailed pursuant to section 42-4-2103 (4) or the date the operator receives notice that no record exists for such vehicle. Such sale shall be made to a licensed motor vehicle dealer or wholesaler, or wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, or through a classified newspaper advertisement published in Colorado. For purposes of this section, a sale shall not be considered commercially reasonable if the vehicle's appraisal value is more than three hundred fifty dollars and the vehicle is sold to an officer or partner of the operator that has possession of the vehicle or to any other person with a proprietary interest in such operator.

Nothing in this section requires that an operator must be a licensed dealer pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44 for purposes of selling a motor vehicle pursuant to this part 21.

Subject to section 42-4-2103 and if an operator conducts a commercially reasonable sale but fails to sell the motor vehicle, the operator may continue to collect daily storage fees for such vehicle actually accrued for up to one hundred twenty days.

If the appraised value of an abandoned motor vehicle sold pursuant to this section is three hundred fifty dollars or less, the sale shall be made only for the purpose of junking, scrapping, or dismantling such motor vehicle, and the purchaser thereof shall not, under any circumstances, be entitled to a Colorado certificate of title. The operator making the sale shall cause to be executed and delivered a bill of sale, together with a copy of the report described in section 42-4-2103 (3), to the person purchasing such motor vehicle. The bill of sale shall state that the purchaser acquires no right to a certificate of title for such vehicle. The operator making the sale shall promptly submit a report of sale, with a copy of the bill of sale, to the department and shall deliver a copy of such report of sale to the purchaser of the motor vehicle. Upon receipt of any report of sale with supporting documents on any sale made pursuant to this subsection (2), the department shall purge the records for such vehicle as provided in section 42-4-2109 (1)(b) and shall not issue a new certificate of title for such vehicle. Any certificate of title issued in violation of this subsection (2) shall be void.

If the appraised value of an abandoned motor vehicle sold pursuant to this section is more than three hundred fifty dollars, the sale may be made for any intended use by the purchaser. The operator making the sale shall cause to be executed and delivered a bill of sale, together with a copy of the report described in section 42-4-2103 (3), and an application for a Colorado certificate of title signed by a legally authorized representative of the operator conducting the sale, to the person purchasing such motor vehicle. The purchaser of the abandoned motor vehicle shall be entitled to a Colorado certificate of title upon application and proof of compliance with the applicable provisions of the "Certificate of Title Act", part 1 of article 6 of this title; except that, if such vehicle is less than five years old, including the current year models, and if the department does not provide the name of an owner of record to the operator, the buyer shall apply for a bonded title and the department shall issue such bonded title upon the applicant meeting the qualifications for such title pursuant to rules promulgated by the department.

Transferring the title of a motor vehicle to an operator to satisfy a debt covered by a lien created pursuant to this part 21 shall not be deemed to be the sale of a motor vehicle.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 480, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 612, § 4, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2009:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended and (1)(c) and (4) added, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, pp. 767, 769, §§ 9, 11, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2067, § 55, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 142, § 21, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1806 (2) as it existed prior to 2002.

42-4-2104.5. Abandonment of motor vehicles of limited value at repair shops - legislative declaration - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 608, § 2, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 542, § 2, effective January 1, 2009.

42-4-2105. Liens upon towed motor vehicles.

Whenever an operator who is registered with the department in accordance with subsection (2) of this section recovers, removes, or stores a motor vehicle upon instructions from the owner of record, any other legally authorized person in control of such motor vehicle, or from the owner or lessee of real property upon which a motor vehicle is illegally parked or such owner's or lessee's agent authorized in writing, such operator shall have a possessory lien, subject to the provisions of section 42-4-2103 (3), upon such motor vehicle and its attached accessories, equipment, and personal property for all the costs and fees for recovering, towing, and storage as authorized in section 42-4-2108. Such lien shall be a first and prior lien on the motor vehicle, and such lien shall be satisfied before all other charges against such motor vehicle. This subsection (1) shall not apply to personal property if subsection (3) of this section applies to such personal property.

No operator shall have a possessory lien upon a motor vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section unless said operator is registered with the department. Such registration shall include the following information:

The location of the operator's tow business;

The hours of operation of the operator's tow business;

The location of the impound lot where vehicles may be claimed by the owner of record; and

Any information relating to a violation of any provision contained in this part 21 or of any other state law or rule relating to the operation, theft, or transfer of motor vehicles.

The executive director of the department may cancel the registration of any operator if an administrative law judge finds, after affording the operator due notice and an opportunity to be heard, that the operator has violated any of the provisions set forth in this part 21.

If the operator obtains personal property from an abandoned vehicle that has been towed pursuant to this part 21 and if the serial or identification number of such property has been visibly altered or removed, the operator shall not have a lien upon such property and shall destroy or discard such property within five days after disposing of such vehicle pursuant to sections 42-4-2104 and 42-4-2107.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 481, § 2, effective July 1.

42-4-2106. Perfection of lien.

The lien provided for in section 42-4-2105 shall be perfected by taking physical possession of the motor vehicle and its attached accessories, equipment, or personal property and by sending to the department, within ten working days after the time possession was taken, a notice containing the information required in the report to be made under the provisions of section 42-4-2103. In addition, such report shall contain a declaration by the operator that a possessory lien is claimed for all past, present, and future charges, up to the date of redemption, and that the lien is enforceable and may be foreclosed pursuant to the provisions of this part 21.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 482, § 2, effective July 1.

42-4-2107. Foreclosure of lien.

Any motor vehicle and its attached accessories and equipment or personal property within or attached to such vehicle that are not redeemed by the last-known owner of record or lienholder after such owner or lienholder has been sent notice of such lien by the operator shall be sold in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-2104.

Within five days after foreclosure of the lien pursuant to this section, the operator shall send a notice to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the operator. Such notice shall contain a list of personal property found within the abandoned vehicle that has an intact serial or identification number and such serial or identification number. Such notification shall be made by certified mail, facsimile machine, or personal delivery.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 483, § 2, effective July 1.

42-4-2108. Proceeds of sale.

If the sale of any motor vehicle, personal property, and attached accessories or equipment under the provisions of section 42-4-2104 produces an amount less than or equal to the sum of all charges of the operator who has perfected his or her lien, then the operator shall have a valid claim against the owner for the full amount of such charges, less the amount received upon the sale of such motor vehicle. Failure to register such vehicle in accordance with this title shall constitute a waiver of such owner's right to be notified pursuant to this part 21 for the purposes of foreclosure of the lien pursuant to section 42-4-2107. Such charges shall be assessed in the manner provided for in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section.

If the sale of any motor vehicle and its attached accessories or equipment under the provisions of section 42-4-2104 produces an amount greater than the sum of all charges of the operator who has perfected his or her lien:

The proceeds shall first satisfy the operator's reasonable costs and fees arising from the sale of the motor vehicle pursuant to section 42-4-2104 and the cost and fees of towing and storing the abandoned motor vehicle with a maximum charge that is specified in rules promulgated by the public utilities commission that govern nonconsensual tows by towing carriers.

In the case of the sale of an abandoned motor vehicle described in section 42-4-2102 (1)(d), any balance remaining after payment pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be paid to the law enforcement agency that is owed a fee for the court-ordered placement of an immobilization device on the motor vehicle pursuant to section 42-4-1105.

Any balance remaining after payment pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (a.5) of this subsection (2) shall be forwarded to the department, and the department may recover from such balance any taxes, fees, and penalties due to it with respect to such motor vehicle. The department shall provide a receipt to the operator within seven days after receiving the money if the operator provides the department with a postage-paid, self-addressed envelope.

Any balance remaining after payment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) shall be paid by the department: First, to any lienholder of record as the lienholder's interest may appear upon the records of the department; second, to any owner of record as the owner's interest may so appear; and then to any person submitting proof of such person's interest in such motor vehicle upon the application of such lienholder, owner, or person. If such payments are not requested and made within one hundred twenty days after the sale of the abandoned motor vehicle, the balance shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(e), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 483, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(c) amended, p. 150, § 29, effective April 5.

L. 2006:

(2)(a.5) added and (2)(b) amended, p. 172, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 769, § 12, effective August 5.

42-4-2109. Transfer and purge of certificates of title.

Whenever any motor vehicle is abandoned and removed and sold in accordance with the procedures set forth in this part 21, the department shall transfer the certificate of title or issue a new certificate of title or shall purge such certificate of title in either of the following cases:

Upon a person's submission to the department of the necessary documents indicating the abandonment, removal, and subsequent sale or transfer of a motor vehicle with an appraised value of more than two hundred dollars, the department shall transfer the certificate of title or issue a new certificate of title for such abandoned motor vehicle.

Upon a person's submission of documents indicating the abandonment, removal, and subsequent wrecking or dismantling of a motor vehicle, including all sales of abandoned motor vehicles with an appraised value of three hundred fifty dollars or less that are conducted pursuant to section 42-4-2104 (2) and all sales of abandoned motor vehicles, as defined in section 38-20-116 (2.5)(b)(I), C.R.S., with a retail fair market value of three hundred fifty dollars or less that are conducted pursuant to section 38-20-116 (2.5)(d)(I), C.R.S., the department shall keep the records for one year and then purge the records for such abandoned motor vehicle; except that the department shall not be required to wait before purging the records if the purchaser is a licensed motor vehicle dealer.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 484, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 613, § 5, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) amended, p. 204, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 546, § 5, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 768, § 10, effective August 5.

42-4-2110. Penalty.

Unless otherwise specified in this part 21, any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this part 21 commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocated provisions, p. 484, § 2, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1566, § 390, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.